Hawaii statutes.
[§171-139] Acquisition. The board may
acquire by exchange, direct purchase, or eminent domain, lands to which private
persons or other public agencies hold title for designation as or inclusion in
an industrial park. The acquisition of lands shall be in accordance with this
chapter. [L 1988, c 361, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next